Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.063

Judges—Lincoln, Skagit, Walla Walla, Whitman, Yakima, Adams, and Whatcom counties.

There shall be in the county of Lincoln one judge of the superior court; in the county of Skagit, four judges of the superior court; in the county of Walla Walla, two judges of the superior court; in the county of Whitman, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Yakima, eight judges of the superior court; in the county of Adams, one judge of the superior court; in the county of Whatcom, five judges of the superior court.

[ 2024 c 112 s 1; 2013 c 210 s 1; 2005 c 95 s 1; 1998 c 270 s 2; 1992 c 189 s 3; 1988 c 66 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 49 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 27 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 83 s 1; 1963 c 48 s 3; 1955 c 19 s 1; 1951 c 125 s 5. Prior: 1949 c 237 ss 2, 4; 1945 c 20 s 1, part; 1927 c 135 s 1, part; 1917 c 97 s 5, part; 1911 c 62 s 1; 1911 c 129 s 2, part; 1907 c 79 s 1, part; 1895 c 89 s 1, part; 1891 c 68 s 3, part; 1890 p 341 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 ss 11045-1j, 11045-1i; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 11045-1d, part; RRS s 11045-1, part.]

NOTES:

Additional judicial position in Whatcom county subject to approval and agreement—2013 c 210: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Whatcom county becomes effective only if the county, through its duly constituted legislative authority, documents its approval of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute." [ 2013 c 210 s 2.]

Contingency of additional judicial position—2005 c 95: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Skagit county shall be effective only if the county through its legislative authority documents its approval by January 1, 2007, of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities." [ 2005 c 95 s 2.]

Effective date—Additional judicial positions in Clark, Lewis, and Yakima counties—Start dates—Establishment by county commissioners upon superior court request—1998 c 270: See notes following RCW 2.08.062.

Effective dates—Additional judicial positions subject to approval and agreement—1992 c 189: See notes following RCW 2.08.061.

Effect—Additional judicial position in Yakima county subject to approval and agreement—1988 c 66: "The additional judicial position created by section 1 of this act in Yakima county shall be effective only if the county through its legislative authority documents its approval by January 1, 1990, of the additional position and its agreement that it will pay out of county funds, without reimbursement from the state, the expenses of the additional judicial position as provided by statute. The additional expenses include, but are not limited to, expenses incurred for court facilities." [ 1988 c 66 s 2.]